src/prepositions.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+PRP

! prepositions / предлоги
LEXICON Root
без       Prep;
благодаря Prep;
близ      Prep;
в         Prep;
во        Prep;
вдоль     Prep;
вместо    Prep;
вне       Prep;
внутри    Prep;
возле     Prep;
вокруг    Prep;
вопреки   Prep;
для       Prep;
до        Prep;
за        Prep;
из        Prep;
из-за     Prep;
из-под    Prep;
к         Prep;
ко        Prep;
кроме     Prep;
мало      Prep;
между     Prep;
мимо      Prep;
много     Prep;
на        Prep;
навстречу Prep;
над       Prep;
накануне  Prep;
наперeкор Prep;
напротив  Prep;
несколько Prep;
о         Prep;
об        Prep;
около     Prep;
от        Prep;
перед     Prep;
по        Prep;
под       Prep;
после     Prep;
посреди   Prep;
при       Prep;
про       Prep;
против    Prep;
ради      Prep;
с         Prep;
со        Prep;
согласно  Prep;
среди     Prep;
у         Prep;
через     Prep;

LEXICON Prep
+PRP:0 #;
